Utah statutes.
53-10-401.    Bureau of Forensic Services -- Creation -- Bureau Chief appointment, qualifications, and compensation.

(1)  There is created within the division the Bureau of Forensic Services.

(2) The bureau shall be administered by a bureau chief appointed by the division director with the approval of the commissioner.

(3) The bureau chief shall be experienced in administration of criminal justice and possess additional qualifications as determined by the commissioner or division director and as provided by law.

(4) The bureau chief acts under the supervision and control of the division director and may be removed from his position at the will of the commissioner.

(5) The bureau chief shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.



Enacted by Chapter 263, 1998 General Session

